Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.245.080

Contracts with community or technical colleges—Courses leading to industry certificates or credentials for high school graduates.

(1) Subject to the provisions of this section and RCW 28B.50.532, a skill center may enter into an agreement with the community or technical college in which district the skill center is located to provide career and technical education courses necessary to complete an industry certificate or credential for students who have received a high school diploma.

(2) To qualify for enrollment under this section, a student must have been enrolled in the skill center before receiving the high school diploma and must remain continuously enrolled in the skill center. A student may enroll only in those courses necessary to complete the industry certificate or credential associated with the student's career and technical program.

(3) Students enrolled in a skill center under this section shall be considered community and technical college students for purposes of enrollment reporting, tuition, and financial aid. The skill center shall maintain enrollment data for students enrolled under this section separately from data on secondary school enrollment.

[ 2008 c 170 s 304.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2008 c 170: See RCW 28A.700.005.